Maryland, session 2025, HB0342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
13–203.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsections (a–1) and (b) of this section, the rate
of the transfer tax:
(I) FOR RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY is:
1. 0.25% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS LESS THAN $300,000;
2. 0.375% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $300,000 BUT LESS
THAN $400,000;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0342*

HOUSE BILL 342
3. 0.5% of the consideration payable for the instrument of
writing IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $400,000 BUT LESS THAN $500,000;
4. 0.75% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $500,000 BUT LESS
THAN $700,000;
5. 1% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $700,000 BUT LESS
THAN $1,000,000;
6. 1.25% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $1,000,000 BUT LESS
THAN $3,000,000; AND
7. 1.5% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $3,000,000; AND
(II) FOR NONRESIDENTIAL PROPERTY IS:
1. 0.5% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS LESS THAN $5,000,000;
2. 0.75% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $5,000,000 BUT LESS
THAN $10,000,000;
3. 1% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $10,000,000 BUT
LESS THAN $20,000,000;
4. 1.25% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $20,000,000 BUT
LESS THAN $40,000,000; AND
5. 1.5% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $40,000,000.
(2) The consideration:
(i) includes the amount of any mortgage or deed of trust assumed
by the grantee; and
(ii) subject to item (i) of this paragraph, includes only the amount

HOUSE BILL 342 3
paid or delivered in return for the sale of the property and does not include the amount of
any debt forgiven or no longer secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on the property.
(a–1) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the rate of the
transfer tax is [0.5%] THE APPLICABLE RATE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION of the consideration paid for the transfer of a controlling interest in a real
property entity as defined in § 13–103 of this title that has developed real property under
Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, the Low Income Housing Tax Credit Program.
(2) The consideration under this subsection shall be the actual payment
made by the purchaser to the seller for the purchase of the interest.
(b) (1) In this subsection, “first–time Maryland home buyer” means an
individual who has never owned in the State residential real property that has been the
individual’s principal residence.
(2) If there are two or more grantees, this subsection does not apply unless
each grantee is a first–time Maryland home buyer or a co–maker or guarantor of a purchase
money mortgage or purchase money deed of trust as defined in § 12–108(i) of this article
for the property and the co–maker or guarantor will not occupy the residence as the
co–maker’s or guarantor’s principal residence.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for a sale of improved
residential real property to a first–time Maryland home buyer who will occupy the property
as a principal residence, the rate of the transfer tax is 0.25% of the consideration payable
for the instrument of writing and the transfer tax shall be paid entirely by the seller.
(4) To qualify for the exemption under paragraph (3) of this subsection,
each grantee or an agent of the grantee shall provide a statement that is signed under oath
by the grantee or agent of the grantee stating that:
(i) 1. the grantee is an individual who has never owned in the
State residential real property that has been the individual’s principal residence; and
2. the residence will be occupied by the grantee as the
grantee’s principal residence; or
(ii) 1. the grantee is a co–maker or guarantor of a purchase
money mortgage or purchase money deed of trust as defined in § 12–108(i) of this article
for the property; and
2. the grantee will not occupy the residence as the
co–maker’s or guarantor’s principal residence.
(5) A statement under paragraph (4) of this subsection by an agent of a
grantee shall state that the statement:

HOUSE BILL 342
(i) is based on a diligent inquiry made by the agent with respect to
the facts set forth in the statement; and
(ii) is true to the best of the knowledge, information, and belief of the
agent.
13–209.
(a) (1) Before any other distribution under this section, in any fiscal year that
bonds secured by a pledge of the State transfer tax are outstanding, the revenue from the
transfer tax shall be used to pay, as and when due, the principal of and interest on the
bonds.
(2) The Department shall deduct the cost of administering the transfer tax
from the taxes collected under this title and credit those revenues to the fund established
under § 1–203.3 of the Corporations and Associations Article.
(3) (I) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection AND
SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (II), (III), AND (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, after
deducting the revenues required under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, the
revenue from transfer tax is payable to the Comptroller for deposit in a special fund.
(II) BEFORE DEPOSITING THE REMAINING TRANSFER TAX
REVENUE IN A SPECIAL FUND UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL CALCULATE AN AMOUNT THAT IS EQUAL TO 28% OF THE
REMAINING TRANSFER TAX REVENUE.
(III) 1. IF THE REMAINING TRANSFER TAX REVENUE LESS
THE AMOUNT CALCULATED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS
LESS THAN THE AVERAGE AMOUNT DEPOSITED IN THE SPECIAL FUND FOR THE 5
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEARS, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL REDUCE THE
PERCENTAGE CALCULATED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO A
PERCENTAGE THAT, WHEN APPLIED TO THE REMAINING TRANSFER TAX REVENUE,
EQUALS THE AVERAGE AMOUNT DEPOSITED IN THE SPECIAL FUND FOR THE 5
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEARS AND DEPOSIT THAT AMOUNT IN THE
SPECIAL FUND.
2. IF THE COMPTROLLER DOES NOT REDUCE OR
REDUCES THE PERCENTAGE CALCULATED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH TO A PERCENTAGE THAT IS GREATER THAN 0%, THE COMPTROLLER
SHALL DEPOSIT THAT PERCENTAGE OF THE REMAINING TRANSFER TAX REVENUE
TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(IV) AFTER THE COMPTROLLER MAKES THE DEPOSITS
REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) AND (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE

HOUSE BILL 342 5
COMPTROLLER SHALL DEPOSIT THE REMAINING TRANSFER TAX REVENUE IN THE
SPECIAL FUND.
(4) In any fiscal year in which transfer tax revenue is used to pay debt
service on outstanding bonds under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the distribution of
revenues in the special fund under this section and as specified in § 5–903(a)(2)(i)1A of the
Natural Resources Article, for State land acquisition, or to the Agricultural Land
Preservation Fund to the extent any debt service is attributable to that Fund, shall be
reduced by an amount equal to the debt service for the fiscal year.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to instruments of writing recorded on or after July 1, 2025.